Utah statutes.
53B-2-108.2.   Appropriation reallocation -- Commissioner reallocation of certain compensation amounts.

Notwithstanding the $1.5 million appropriated for fiscal year 2012 to the eight higher education institutions for compensation in Senate Bill 3, Appropriation Adjustments, 2011 General Session, and Senate Bill 6, State Agency and Higher Education Compensation Appropriations, 2011 General Session, the commissioner of higher education shall equalize the money appropriated to each higher education institution for compensation in those bills by removing excess money from some institutions and transferring the money to underfunded institutions so that each higher education institution takes a 0.6% reduction of their cumulative fiscal year 2011 general fund and education fund base appropriation.

